Maryland, session 2026, HB0204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) (1) “Public water system” means a system that:
(i) Provides to the public water for human consumption through
pipes or other constructed conveyances; and
(ii) 1. Has at least 15 service connections; or
2. Regularly serves at least 25 individuals.
(2) “Public water system” includes:
(i) Any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution facility that is
under the control of the operator of the system and is used primarily in connection with the
system; and
(ii) Any collection or pretreatment storage facility that is not under
the control of the operator of the system and is used primarily in connection with the
system.
(m) “Supplier of water” means any person who owns or operates a public water
system.
9–412.
(a) A supplier of water may not:
(1) Fail to comply with § 9–410 of this subtitle;
(2) Disseminate any false or misleading information in or about any notice
required under § 9–410 of this subtitle or about any remedial action being undertaken to
achieve compliance with State primary drinking water regulations;

HOUSE BILL 204 3
(3) Knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in
any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or permit adopted or issued
under this subtitle;
(4) Fail to comply with the rules and regulations adopted under § 9–407 of
this subtitle; [or]
(5) Fail to comply with any conditions for variances or exemptions
authorized under § 9–409 of this subtitle; OR
(6) FAIL TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF PART III OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(b) A person may not:
(1) Fail to comply with any order issued by the Secretary under this
subtitle; or
(2) Falsify or knowingly render inaccurate any monitoring device or
method required to be maintained under this subtitle or any rule, regulation, order, or
permit adopted or issued under this subtitle.
9–413.
(a) A person who willfully violates § 9–412(a)(4) [or], (5), OR (6) of this subtitle
is subject to a civil penalty of up to $5,000 for each day on which the violation exists.
(b) A person who violates § 9–412(a)(1), (2), or (3) of this subtitle is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $5,000 for each day on
which the violation occurs or failure to comply continues.
(c) In an action brought in the appropriate court to enforce the order, a person
who willfully violates or fails or refuses to comply with any order issued by the Secretary
under this subtitle may be fined not more than $5,000 for each day on which the violation
occurs or failure to comply continues.
(d) (1) In addition to any other remedies available at law and after an
opportunity for a hearing, which may be waived in writing by the person accused of a
violation, the Department may impose a penalty for violation of any provision of this
subtitle or any order, regulation, or plan adopted or issued under this subtitle.
(2) The penalty imposed on a supplier of water serving a population of more
than 10,000 under this subsection shall be:

HOUSE BILL 204
(i) Up to $1,000 per day for each violation, but not exceeding
$25,000 total for each violation; and
(ii) Assessed with consideration given to:
1. The willfulness of the violation, the extent to which the
existence of the violation was known to but uncorrected by the violator, and the extent to
which the violator exercised reasonable care;
2. Any actual harm to the environment or to human health,
including injury to or impairment of the use of the waters of this State or the natural
resources of the State;
3. The cost of cleanup and the cost of restoration of natural
resources;
4. The nature and degree of injury to or interference with
general welfare, health, and property;
5. The extent to which the location of the violation, including
location near waters of this State or areas of human population, creates the potential for
harm to the environment or to human health or safety;
6. The available technology and economic reasonableness of
controlling, reducing, or eliminating the violation;
7. The degree of hazard posed by the particular pollutant or
pollutants involved;
8. The extent to which the current violation is part of a
recurrent pattern of the same or similar type of violation committed by the violator; and
9. Whether or not penalties were assessed or will be assessed
under other provisions of this subtitle.
(3) The penalty imposed on a supplier of water serving a population of
3,301 to 10,000 under this subsection shall be:
(i) Up to $500 per day for each violation, but not exceeding $12,500
total for each violation; and
(ii) Assessed with consideration given to the factors set forth in
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
(4) The penalty imposed on a supplier of water serving a population of 501
to 3,300 under this subsection shall be:

HOUSE BILL 204 5
(i) Up to $250 per day for each violation, but not exceeding $6,250
total for each violation; and
(ii) Assessed with consideration given to the factors set forth in
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
(5) The penalty imposed on a supplier of water serving a population of 500
or less under this subsection shall be:
(i) Up to $100 per day for each violation, but not exceeding $5,000
total for each violation; and
(ii) Assessed with consideration given to the factors set forth in
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
(6) Each day a violation occurs is a separate violation under this
subsection.
(7) Any penalty imposed under this subsection is payable to the State and
collectible in any manner provided at law for the collection of penalties.
(8) (I) [All] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, ALL penalties collected under this subtitle shall be paid into the
Maryland Clean Water Fund created under § 9–320 of this title.
(II) ANY PENALTIES COLLECTED FOR A VIOLATION OF §
9–412(A)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO A SPECIAL FUND IN THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, TO BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES
SPECIFIED IN § 9–435 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–427. RESERVED.
9–428. RESERVED.
PART III. CONTROL AND PREVENTION OF WATERBORNE DISEASE.
9–429.
(A) IN THIS PART III OF THIS SUBTITLE, “DISRUPTION IN THE WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM” MEANS ANY DISRUPTION TO NORMAL WATER
TRANSMISSION WITHIN A PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM.
(B) “DISRUPTION IN THE WATER DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 204
(1) A CHANGE IN THE WATER TREATMENT PROCESS, INCLUDING
TEMPORARY CHANGES FROM THE USE OF CHLORINE TO THE USE OF CHLORAMINE
OR VICE VERSA;
(2) ANY PLANNED OR UNPLANNED EVENT THAT REDUCES WATER
DELIVERY PRESSURE BELOW 20 POUNDS PER SQUARE INCH;
(3) A LEAD SERVICE LINE REPLACEMENT;
(4) A NEW CONSTRUCTION TIE–IN;
(5) A SOURCE WATER CHANGE;
(6) WATER TREATMENT PLANT MAINTENANCE OR CHANGES;
(7) CHANGES IN DIRECTIONAL WATER FLOW;
(8) FLOODING;
(9) THE REPLACEMENT OF VALVES, HYDRANTS, OR METERS;
(10) PUMPING FAILURES;
(11) PIPELINE OR WATER MAIN BREAKS;
(12) SYSTEM REPAIRS; OR
(13) EMERGENCY CONDITIONS.
9–430.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING § 9–407(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 1, 2026, EACH SUPPLIER OF WATER SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN IN ALL ACTIVE PARTS OF THE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM
A DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL LEVEL OF AT LEAST:
(I) 0.5 MILLIGRAMS OF FREE CHLORINE PER LITER; OR
(II) 1.0 MILLIGRAMS OF MONOCHLORAMINE PER LITER; AND
(2) CONDUCT DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL TESTING AT FREQUENT AND
REGULAR INTERVALS TO DETERMINE THE AMOUNT AND TYPE OF DETECTABLE

HOUSE BILL 204 7
DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL EXISTING AT DIFFERENT POINTS IN THE PUBLIC WATER
SYSTEM.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO:
(I) REQUIRE NITRIFICATION PLANS FOR PUBLIC WATER
SYSTEMS THAT UTILIZE MONOCHLORAMINE; AND
(II) ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR THE MONITORING OF A
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM DURING CONSTRUCTION ACTIVITIES THAT MAY IMPACT THE
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE MEASURES DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(I) INCREASE MINIMUM DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT
RESIDUAL LEVEL REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC WATER SYSTEMS; OR
(II) ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL DISINFECTANT OR TESTING
REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC WATER SYSTEMS TO MINIMIZE THE GROWTH AND
TRANSMISSION OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REDUCE THE MINIMUM DETECTABLE
DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL LEVEL REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A SUPPLIER
OF WATER FAILS TO MEET THE MINIMUM DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION OF THE VIOLATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE A THIRD–PARTY ENTITY TO
CONDUCT AN INVESTIGATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP PROCEDURES AND
GUIDELINES REGARDING THE INVESTIGATION OF SUPPLIERS OF WATER UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 204
(I) A DEFINITION OF WHAT CONSTITUTES A REPEATED
FAILURE TO MEET MINIMUM DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL
REQUIREMENTS;
(II) REQUIREMENTS FOR REPORTING VIOLATIONS OF MINIMUM
DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL REQUIREMENTS;
(III) GUIDANCE ON WHEN TO INITIATE INITIAL AND
SUBSEQUENT INVESTIGATIONS OF VIOLATIONS OF MINIMUM DETECTABLE
DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL REQUIREMENTS;
(IV) THE DEVELOPMENT OF A NOTICE TO INFORM THE PERSONS
SERVED BY A SUPPLIER OF WATER IF THE SUPPLIER OF WATER FAILS TO MAINTAIN
THE MINIMUM DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL LEVELS REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SECTION; AND
(V) IF APPLICABLE, THE CRITERIA USED BY THE DEPARTMENT
TO SELECT THIRD–PARTY ENTITIES TO CONDUCT INVESTIGATIONS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
9–431.
(A) (1) A SUPPLIER OF WATER SHALL PROVIDE TIMELY WRITTEN NOTICE
OF ANY DISRUPTION IN THE WATER DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM THAT COULD RESULT IN
INCREASED LEVELS OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA TO ALL RESIDENTIAL,
COMMERCIAL, AND INSTITUTIONAL CUSTOMERS SERVED BY THE PUBLIC WATER
SYSTEM AND LOCATED IN THE AREA AFFECTED BY THE DISRUPTION.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL BE IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED
BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE NOTICE SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:
(I) NOTIFICATION THAT PLANNED CONSTRUCTION,
MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR REPLACEMENT OF A PART OF THE WATER DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM MAY AFFECT AND TEMPORARILY INCREASE THE LEVELS OF LEGIONELLA
BACTERIA IN THE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM;
(II) THE ESTIMATED LENGTH OF TIME THAT THE LEVEL OF
LEGIONELLA BACTERIA MAY REMAIN ELEVATED, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT;

HOUSE BILL 204 9
(III) GENERAL INFORMATION ON THE POSSIBLE SOURCES OF
LEGIONELLA BACTERIA IN THE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM AND THE HEALTH EFFECTS
OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE AND RELATED ILLNESSES ON AT–RISK POPULATIONS;
AND
(IV) INFORMATION ON MEASURES CONSUMERS CAN TAKE TO
REDUCE OR ELIMINATE EXPOSURE TO LEGIONELLA BACTERIA, INCLUDING:
1. ENSURING HOT WATER HEATERS ARE WORKING
PROPERLY AND MAINTAINING A TEMPERATURE OF AT LEAST 130 DEGREES
FAHRENHEIT AT THE WATER HEATER OUTLET;
2. FLUSHING WATER LINES, INCLUDING THE HOT
WATER HEATER DRAIN AND EXTERNAL HOSE CONNECTIONS, DURING AND AFTER
COMPLETION OF CONSTRUCTION WORK;
3. REMOVING AND CLEANING FAUCET AERATOR
SCREENS AND SHOWERHEADS; AND
4. INSTALLING A WATER FILTRATION SYSTEM OR WATER
TREATMENT DEVICE CERTIFIED TO REMOVE LEGIONELLA BACTERIA.
(B) (1) AS SOON AS POSSIBLE, AND NOT LATER THAN 24 HOURS AFTER
THE OCCURRENCE OF A DISRUPTION IN THE WATER DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM, A
SUPPLIER OF WATER SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN RECORD OF THE DISRUPTION TO
THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH ON ITS WEBSITE A
PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE DATABASE OF THE RECORDS OF DISRUPTIONS IN THE WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS SPECIFYING THE FORM AND MANNER OF NOTICES REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL INCLUDE THE SPECIFIC INFORMATION
TO BE INCLUDED IN NOTICES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH REGULATIONS ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
9–432.

HOUSE BILL 204
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DE–IDENTIFIED DATA” MEANS INFORMATION:
(I) THAT DOES NOT IDENTIFY ANY INDIVIDUAL;
(II) FOR WHICH THERE IS NO REASONABLE BASIS TO BELIEVE
THAT THE INFORMATION CAN BE USED TO IDENTIFY ANY INDIVIDUAL; AND
(III) THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR DE–IDENTIFICATION
OF PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION UNDER THE FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE
PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996 AND IMPLEMENTING
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES.
(3) “WATER EXPOSURE POINT” MEANS A LOCATION WHERE AN
INDIVIDUAL DIAGNOSED WITH LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE RESIDED, WAS EMPLOYED,
OR FREQUENTLY VISITED WITHIN THE 14 DAYS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE
INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS.
(B) FOR EACH REPORTED DIAGNOSIS OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE, THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT A COMPREHENSIVE INVESTIGATION INTO THE
REPORTED CASE; AND
(2) ADVISE THE INDIVIDUAL DIAGNOSED WITH LEGIONNAIRES’
DISEASE ABOUT THE AVAILABILITY OF TESTING BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH OF THE FIXTURES AND WATER–USING EQUIPMENT AT WATER EXPOSURE
POINTS IDENTIFIED BY THE INDIVIDUAL.
(C) (1) IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE CONSENT PROVIDED BY THE
INDIVIDUAL DIAGNOSED WITH LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE OR THE OWNER OF THE
PROPERTY, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL SAMPLE AND TEST
FIXTURES AND WATER–USING EQUIPMENT AT THE WATER EXPOSURE POINTS
IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE PRESENCE OF
LEGIONELLA BACTERIA.
(2) EACH TEST SHALL BE CONDUCTED BY A LABORATORY CERTIFIED
FOR THIS PURPOSE BY THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 204 11
(D) (1) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL DEVELOP
PROCEDURES AND GUIDELINES REGARDING THE INVESTIGATION OF EACH
REPORTED DIAGNOSIS OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE PROCEDURES AND GUIDELINES SHALL, AT A MINIMUM,
INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS REGARDING:
(I) THE DOCUMENTATION OF ANY DISRUPTION IN THE WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVING WATER EXPOSURE POINTS IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION THAT MAY HAVE CAUSED THE RELEASE
OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA INTO THE WATER EXPOSURE POINTS;
(II) THE INVESTIGATION OF POTENTIAL SOURCES OF
EXPOSURE TO LEGIONELLA BACTERIA FROM FIXTURES, WATER–USING EQUIPMENT,
OR FEATURES AT THE INDIVIDUAL’S RESIDENCE, INCLUDING WATER EXPOSURES
EXTERNAL TO THE RESIDENCE SUCH AS IRRIGATION, HOSES, OR WATER–BASED
EQUIPMENT AND DEVICES; AND
(III) THE INVESTIGATION OF POTENTIAL SOURCES OF
EXPOSURE TO LEGIONELLA BACTERIA FROM OTHER IDENTIFIED WATER EXPOSURE
POINTS, SUCH AS:
1. VISITS TO BUILDINGS, WATER FEATURES, OR CAR
WASHES; AND
2. EXPOSURE TO IRRIGATION SYSTEMS, PRESSURE
WASHING, CAR WINDSHIELD FLUIDS, PUBLIC FOUNTAINS OR TOILETS, OR OTHER
ASPECTS OF DAILY TRAVEL AND ACTIVITIES.
(E) AS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH DEEMS APPROPRIATE,
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH MAY DELEGATE ITS RESPONSIBILITIES
REGARDING TESTING AND INVESTIGATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE LOCAL
HEALTH DEPARTMENT FOR THE JURISDICTION WHERE A PATIENT DIAGNOSED WITH
LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE LIVES, FREQUENTLY VISITS, OR IS EMPLOYED.
(F) (1) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL ESTABLISH ON
ITS WEBSITE A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE REGISTRY OF DE–IDENTIFIED DATA RELATED
TO EACH CASE OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL MAKE EVERY
EFFORT TO PROVIDE INFORMATION THROUGH THE REGISTRY ON THE

HOUSE BILL 204
APPROXIMATE LOCATION OF EACH CASE OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE TO THE
NEAREST CITY BLOCK OR GENERAL NEIGHBORHOOD DESCRIPTION.
9–433.
(A) (1) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL IMMEDIATELY
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ANY REPORTED DIAGNOSIS OF LEGIONNAIRES’
DISEASE.
(2) A NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE
ADDRESSES WHERE THE INDIVIDUAL DIAGNOSED WITH LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE
RESIDED, FREQUENTLY VISITED, OR WAS EMPLOYED IN THE MONTH IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S DIAGNOSIS.
(B) (1) UPON RECEIPT OF A NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SAMPLE AND TEST THE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM
FOR THE PRESENCE OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA AT ALL LOCATIONS IDENTIFIED IN
THE NOTICE.
(2) ALL TESTING REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
CONDUCTED:
(I) BY A LABORATORY CERTIFIED FOR THIS PURPOSE BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE SAMPLING AND TESTING
METHODS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) IF THE PRESENCE OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA IS DETECTED THROUGH
INITIAL TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT, OR REQUIRE THE SUPPLIER OF WATER FOR THE
APPLICABLE PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM TO CONDUCT, FURTHER TESTING TO CONFIRM
THE PRESENCE OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA IN ANY SOURCE AS DETERMINED
NECESSARY BY THE DEPARTMENT.
9–434.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COVERED BUILDING” MEANS A BUILDING THAT
MEETS THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THE AMERICAN SOCIETY OF HEATING,
REFRIGERATION, AND AIR CONDITIONING ENGINEERS (ASHRAE) STANDARD
188–2018.

HOUSE BILL 204 13
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED BUILDING SHALL IMPLEMENT A WATER MANAGEMENT PROGRAM TO
MINIMIZE THE GROWTH AND TRANSMISSION OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA IN THE
BUILDING’S WATER SYSTEM, CONSISTENT WITH ASHRAE STANDARD 188–2018.
(C) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED BUILDING SHALL MAKE THE
WATER MANAGEMENT PROGRAM AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST TO AN EMPLOYEE OF
THE DEPARTMENT, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, OR ANY OTHER
STATE OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT WITH LICENSE OR INSPECTION AUTHORITY FOR THE
COVERED BUILDING.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, OR ANY
OTHER STATE OR LOCAL DEPARTMENT WITH LICENSE OR INSPECTION AUTHORITY
MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION CONSISTENT WITH ITS EXISTING AUTHORITY.
9–435.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH SHALL DEVELOP A PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGN AND TARGETED
CONSUMER EDUCATION PROGRAM TO EDUCATE CONSUMERS, ESPECIALLY
VULNERABLE POPULATIONS, ON:
(1) THE ENVIRONMENTAL SOURCES OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA;
(2) THE MOVEMENT OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA THROUGH WATER
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS;
(3) THE NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART III OF THIS
SUBTITLE AND HOW THE REQUIREMENTS IMPACT CONSUMERS; AND
(4) THE METHODS TO CONTROL LEGIONELLA BACTERIA IN A
PERSON’S HOME.
(B) THE PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGN AND EDUCATION PROGRAM SHALL,
AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:
(1) INFORMATION ON THE RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE RISKS OF
THE PROLIFERATION OF LEGIONELLA BACTERIA AND WATER TEMPERATURE;
(2) THE TEMPERATURE REQUIREMENTS FOR MEDICAL DEVICES,
EXPANSION TANKS, HOT TUBS, WHIRLPOOLS, SPAS, POOLS, AIR–CONDITIONING
EQUIPMENT, ORNAMENTAL FOUNTAINS, AND OTHER EQUIPMENT OR DEVICES THAT

HOUSE BILL 204
RELEASE WATER AEROSOLS IN A PERSON’S HOME OR ON A PERSON’S PROPERTY;
AND
(3) THE RELATED RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE INHALATION BY
VULNERABLE POPULATIONS OF WATER DROPLETS CONTAINING LEGIONELLA
BACTERIA.
9–436.
ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH,
SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF CASES OF LEGIONNAIRES’ DISEASE IN THE
STATE REPORTED IN EACH OF THE PREVIOUS 10 YEARS;
(2) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF VIOLATIONS OF THIS PART III OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR WHICH PENALTIES WERE ASSESSED; AND
(3) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LEGISLATIVE ACTION AS MAY BE
NECESSARY TO FURTHER CONTROL LEGIONELLA BACTERIA AND OTHER
WATERBORNE PATHOGENS IN THE PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY AND AFFECTED
BUILDINGS, INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING WHETHER THE MINIMUM
DETECTABLE DISINFECTANT RESIDUAL LEVEL REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC WATER
SYSTEMS SHOULD BE INCREASED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.